Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-250
Mobile barber shop license; application.

Any person seeking a license to operate a mobile barber shop shall submit a completed application to the board as provided in section 71-219.02, and along with the application, the applicant shall submit a detailed floor plan or blueprint of the proposed barber shop sufficient to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of section 71-249.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 85.
January 1, 2019